Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Motor Vehicle Licenses

186.020.
Registration requirement — Application for registration — Application and other documents to be sent to Transportation Cabinet — Renewal by mail — Extension of renewal period for military personnel stationed outside United States. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

Before the owner of a motor vehicle, other than a motor vehicle engaged in the transportation of passengers for hire operating under a certificate of convenience and necessity, may operate it or permit its operation upon a highway, the owner shall apply for registration in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet, except that a person who purchases a motor vehicle, or brings a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state shall make application for registration within fifteen (15) days. The bill of sale or assigned title must be in the motor vehicle during this fifteen (15) day period. If the owner of a motor vehicle is an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which he resides. If the owner of a motor vehicle does not reside in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which the motor vehicle is principally operated. If the owner of a motor vehicle is other than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of either county. The application when presented to the county clerk for registration shall be accompanied by:

A bill of sale and a manufacturer’s certificate of origin if the application is for the registration of a new motor vehicle;

The owner’s registration receipt, if the motor vehicle was last registered in this state;

A bill of sale and the previous registration receipt, if last registered in another state where the law of that state does not require the owner of a motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

A certificate of title, if last registered in another state where the law of that state requires the owner of a motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

An affidavit from an officer of a local government saying that the motor vehicle has been abandoned and that the provisions of KRS

82.630

have been complied with, for local governments which elect to use the provisions of KRS

82.600

to

82.640

; and

The application from a person who has brought a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state shall be accompanied by proof that the motor vehicle is insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

.

After that, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the owner of any motor vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(1) or (2) shall register his motor vehicle on or before the date on which his certificate of registration expires. If, before operating the motor vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at some later date and pays the fee for the full year, he or she will be deemed to have complied with the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration with the cabinet.

After that, the owner of any commercial vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(3) to (14) shall register the commercial vehicle on or before April 1 of each year. If, before operating a commercial vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at some later date and pays the required fee, he or she will be deemed to have complied with the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration with the cabinet, except the owner of any commercial motor vehicle to be registered pursuant to the International Registration Plan under KRS 186.050(13) shall register the commercial motor vehicles on or before the last day of the month of registration established pursuant to KRS 186.051(3).

The application and documents presented therewith, including the sheriff’s certificate of inspection, shall be affixed to the Transportation Cabinet copy of the certificate of title or registration and sent to the Transportation Cabinet by the clerk.

At least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of registration of any motor vehicle previously registered in the Commonwealth as provided by KRS

186A.035

, the owner of the vehicle shall be notified by mail on the same notice required by KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. In addition, the department shall provide appropriate forms and information to permit renewal of motor vehicle registration to be completed by mail. Any registration renewal by mail shall require payment of an additional two dollar ($2) fee which shall be received by the county clerk. Nonreceipt of the notice herein shall not constitute a defense to any registration related offense.

If an individual has been serving in the United States military stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries of the United States, he or she shall renew the registration on the vehicle within thirty (30) days of his or her return if:

The motor vehicle has been stored on a military base during the time of deployment and has not been operated on the public highways during that time; and

The vehicle’s registration expired during the individual’s absence.

An individual who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be convicted or cited for driving a vehicle with expired registration within thirty (30) days after the individual’s return to the Commonwealth if the individual can provide proof of meeting the eligibility criteria under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

When an individual presents evidence of meeting the criteria under paragraph (a) of this subsection when applying to renew the registration on the motor vehicle, the county clerk shall, when applicable, treat the registration as a prorated renewal under KRS

186.051

, and charge the individual a registration fee only for the number of months of the registration year the vehicle will be used on the public highways.

History.

2739g-2a, 2739g-9: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 208, § 1; 1954, ch. 153, § 1; 1958, ch. 82, § 1; 1966, ch. 139, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1976, ch. 133, § 4; 1978, ch. 239, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 416, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 363, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 431, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 428, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 97, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 341, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 153, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 565, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 14, effective April 25, 2006; 2009, ch. 10, § 65, effective January 1, 2010.

186.020.
Registration requirement — Application for registration — Application and other documents to be sent to Transportation Cabinet — Renewal by mail — Extension of renewal period for military personnel stationed outside United States — Exceptions. [Effective January 1, 2024]

Before the owner of a motor vehicle may operate it or permit its operation upon a highway, the owner shall apply for registration in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet, except that a person who purchases a motor vehicle, or brings a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state shall make application for registration within fifteen (15) days. The bill of sale or assigned title must be in the motor vehicle during this fifteen (15) day period. If the owner of a motor vehicle is an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides. If the owner of a motor vehicle does not reside in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of the county in which the motor vehicle is principally operated. If the owner of a motor vehicle is other than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the motor vehicle shall be registered with the county clerk of either county. The application when presented to the county clerk for registration shall be accompanied by:

A bill of sale and a manufacturer’s certificate of origin if the application is for the registration of a new motor vehicle;

The owner’s registration receipt, if the motor vehicle was last registered in this state;

A bill of sale and the previous registration receipt, if last registered in another state where the law of that state does not require the owner of a motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

A certificate of title, if last registered in another state where the law of that state requires the owner of a motor vehicle to obtain a certificate of title or ownership;

An affidavit from an officer of a local government saying that the motor vehicle has been abandoned and that the provisions of KRS

82.630

have been complied with, for local governments which elect to use the provisions of KRS

82.600

to

82.640

; and

The application from a person who has brought a motor vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state shall be accompanied by proof that the motor vehicle is insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

.

After that, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, the owner of any motor vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(1) or (2) shall register his or her motor vehicle on or before the date on which his or her certificate of registration expires. If, before operating the motor vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at some later date and pays the fee for the full year, he or she will be deemed to have complied with the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration with the cabinet.

After that, the owner of any commercial vehicle registered under KRS 186.050(3) to (14) shall register the commercial vehicle on or before April 1 of each year. If, before operating a commercial vehicle in this state, the owner registers it at some later date and pays the required fee, he or she will be deemed to have complied with the law. Insofar as the owner is concerned, registration with the clerk shall be deemed to be registration with the cabinet, except the owner of any commercial motor vehicle to be registered pursuant to the International Registration Plan under KRS 186.050(13) shall register the commercial motor vehicles on or before the last day of the month of registration established pursuant to KRS 186.051(3).

The application and documents presented therewith, including the sheriff’s certificate of inspection, shall be affixed to the Transportation Cabinet copy of the certificate of title or registration and sent to the Transportation Cabinet by the clerk.

At least forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of registration of any motor vehicle previously registered in the Commonwealth as provided by KRS

186A.035

, the owner of the vehicle shall be notified by mail on the same notice required by KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. In addition, the department shall provide appropriate forms and information to permit renewal of motor vehicle registration to be completed by mail. Any registration renewal by mail shall require payment of an additional two dollar ($2) fee which shall be received by the county clerk. Nonreceipt of the notice herein shall not constitute a defense to any registration related offense.

If an individual has been serving in the United States military stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries of the United States, he or she shall renew the registration on the vehicle within thirty (30) days of his or her return if:

The motor vehicle has been stored on a military base during the time of deployment and has not been operated on the public highways during that time; and

The vehicle’s registration expired during the individual’s absence.

An individual who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be convicted or cited for driving a vehicle with expired registration within thirty (30) days after the individual’s return to the Commonwealth if the individual can provide proof of meeting the eligibility criteria under paragraph (a) of this subsection.

When an individual presents evidence of meeting the criteria under paragraph (a) of this subsection when applying to renew the registration on the motor vehicle, the county clerk shall, when applicable, treat the registration as a prorated renewal under KRS

186.051

, and charge the individual a registration fee only for the number of months of the registration year the vehicle will be used on the public highways.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to vehicles for which permanent registration has been obtained pursuant to KRS

186A.127

.

HISTORY:

2739g-2a, 2739g-9: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 208, § 1; 1954, ch. 153, § 1; 1958, ch. 82, § 1; 1966, ch. 139, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1976, ch. 133, § 4; 1978, ch. 239, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 296, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 416, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 363, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 431, § 9, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 428, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 97, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 341, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 153, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 565, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXVIII, § 14, effective April 25, 2006; 2009, ch. 10, § 65, effective January 1, 2010; 2022 ch. 18, § 16, effective January 1, 2024.

186.021.
Issuance of replacement plate, decal, registration certificate, or renewal for motor vehicle on which ad valorem taxes are delinquent or which is uninsured — Option of purchaser to pay delinquent taxes.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a county clerk shall not issue a replacement plate, decal, or registration certificate as provided in KRS

186.180

, or a registration for renewal to any person who on January 1 of any year owned a motor vehicle on which state, county, city, urban-county government, school, or special taxing district ad valorem taxes are delinquent.

Pursuant to KRS 134.810(4), the owner as defined in KRS 186.010(7)(a) and (c) on January 1 of any year shall be liable for taxes due on a motor vehicle. A person other than the owner of record who applies to a county clerk to transfer the registration of a motor vehicle may pay any delinquent ad valorem taxes due on the motor vehicle to facilitate the county clerk’s transferring registration of the motor vehicle. The person applying shall not be required to pay delinquent ad valorem taxes due on any other motor vehicle owned by the owner of record from which he is purchasing his motor vehicle as a condition of registration.

A county clerk shall not issue a replacement plate, decal, or registration certificate as provided in KRS

186.180

, or a registration renewal for any motor vehicle that is not insured in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

. Each applicant for registration renewal shall present proof of compliance to the county clerk in a manner prescribed in administrative regulations issued by the Department of Insurance. On and after January 1, 2006, if the motor vehicle is a personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS

304.39-087

, proof of insurance shall be determined by the county clerk as provided in KRS

186A.042

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 264, § 14, effective January 1, 1984; 1984, ch. 54, § 8, effective January 1, 1985; 1984, ch. 129, § 1, effective January 1, 1985; 1984, ch. 391, § 7, effective January 1, 1985; 1988, ch. 113, § 7, effective December 31, 1988; 1994, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 316, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 130, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 233, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2002). The amendments made to subsection (2) of this statute in 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 316, sec. 1, “shall apply for tax assessments made on or after January 1, 2003.” 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 316, sec. 5.

186.023.
Title and registration cancelled upon notice of transfer from another jurisdiction.

The Transportation Cabinet shall cancel the registration and title of any motor vehicle registered or titled in Kentucky within thirty (30) days following receipt of notification from another jurisdiction that the Kentucky title issued for such motor vehicle has been surrendered.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 113, § 6, effective December 31, 1988.

186.025.
Cabinet to furnish list of owners of registered vehicles to Department of Revenue.

Effective January 1, 1981, the Transportation Cabinet shall, by April 1 of each year, provide the Department of Revenue with a listing of all owners of motor vehicles registered in Kentucky on an anniversary basis under KRS

186.051

as of the preceding January 1. The listing shall be by counties and shall contain, in addition to the name of the owners, the owners’ addresses, and the make, model and year of all vehicles owned by the registrants. The county clerk shall continue to provide copies of motor vehicle registration certificates on all motor vehicles not registered under the provisions of KRS

186.051

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 233, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 2005, ch. 85, § 605, effective June 20, 2005.

186.030.
Form of application.

The application form shall contain spaces for the names and post office addresses of the owner and of the lien holder as shown by chattel mortgage, or other instrument construed as such in this state, on file in the office of the county clerk in the county in which the motor vehicle is registered, and such other information as the cabinet may require. If the motor vehicle is a truck designed for the transportation of property, the application form shall contain space for the declared gross weight in pounds. The declared gross weight shall be the weight of the vehicle and the heaviest load that the vehicle will be used to carry at any time on the highways.

The application, when completed, shall be presented to the county clerk and accompanied by the appropriate fee.

History.

2739g-2b: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 96; 1946, ch. 15, § 2; 1954, ch. 153, § 2; 1958, ch. 82, § 2.

186.032.
Voluntary inclusion of information that an owner, lesser, or operator of a motor vehicle is deaf or hard of hearing in Kentucky vehicle registration system database — Deaf or hard of hearing protection trust fund — Use of fund. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

At the time of initial application for registration or application for renewal, the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may inform the county clerk that he or she, or someone who may be operating the vehicle, is deaf or hard of hearing and request that information be included in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database to assist law enforcement in identifying the operator of the vehicle as possibly being deaf or hard of hearing.

The deaf or hard of hearing protection trust fund is created as a separate trust fund in the State Treasury. The trust fund shall consist of any proceeds from gifts, grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the trust fund.

The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Commission on the Deaf or Hard of Hearing.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, trust fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become part of the trust fund and shall not lapse.

Trust fund moneys deposited in this fund shall only be used to:

Reimburse the Transportation Cabinet for the cost of including information that someone is deaf or hard of hearing in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database;

Support other actions to protect the safety and welfare of persons who are deaf or hard of hearing; and

Educate the public and the deaf and hard of hearing community on issues confronting the deaf and hard of hearing.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 57, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

186.032.
Voluntary inclusion of information that an owner, lesser, or operator of a motor vehicle is deaf or hard of hearing or has a communication disorder in Kentucky vehicle registration system database — Deaf or hard of hearing protection trust fund — Notice of availability of database designation. [Effective January 1, 2024]

As used in this section, “communication disorder” means a health condition or disability that may impede effective communication with a peace officer.

The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may inform the county clerk that he or she, or someone who may be operating the vehicle, is deaf or hard of hearing and request that information be included in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database to assist law enforcement in identifying the operator of the vehicle as possibly being deaf or hard of hearing.

The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may inform the county clerk that he or she, or someone who may be operating the vehicle, has a communication disorder and request that information be included in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database to assist law enforcement in identifying the operator of the vehicle as possibly having a communication disorder.

The deaf or hard of hearing protection trust fund is created as a separate trust fund in the State Treasury. The trust fund shall consist of any proceeds from gifts, grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of the trust fund.

The fund shall be administered by the Kentucky Commission on the Deaf or Hard of Hearing.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, trust fund amounts not expended at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become part of the trust fund and shall not lapse.

Trust fund moneys deposited in this fund shall only be used to:

Reimburse the Transportation Cabinet for the cost of including information that someone is deaf or hard of hearing or has a communication disorder in the Kentucky vehicle registration system database;

Support other actions to protect the safety and welfare of persons who are deaf or hard of hearing or have a communication disorder; and

Educate the public, the deaf and hard of hearing community, and the communication disorder community on issues confronting the deaf and hard of hearing and those with communication disorders.

Every county clerk shall post a permanent notice containing information about the availability of a deaf or hard of hearing or a communication disorder designation in the Kentucky vehicle registration database. The notice shall be printed in bold face type of sufficient point size to be read from a distance of at least three (3) feet. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place to ensure that every person who enters the county clerk’s office will readily see the notice.

The Transportation Cabinet shall put information on its Web site about the availability of a deaf or hard of hearing or a communication disorder designation in the Kentucky vehicle registration database.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 57, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 99, § 1, effective January 1, 2024.

186.035.
Payment of ad valorem tax as condition to registration. [Repealed.]

186.040.
Issuance of certificate of registration — Plates — Clerk’s fee — Donations to child care assistance account
— Additional fees and distribution.

Upon receiving the application and fee, the county clerk shall issue to the owner a certificate of registration containing the information required by subsection (2) of this section and a registration plate. If the cabinet finds that there is a shortage of materials suitable for making plates, or that a substantial saving will result, it may require by regulation with the approval of the Governor that previously issued plates continue to be used for a designated period. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and in KRS

186.162

, for services performed, the owner shall pay the county clerk the sum of six dollars ($6) for each registration, or if the registration exceeds a twelve (12) month period, the clerk shall receive a fee of nine dollars ($9).

The certificate of registration shall contain the registration number, the name and post office address of the owner, and such other information as the cabinet may require.

An owner who registers a vehicle under KRS

186.050

that has a declared gross vehicle weight with any towed unit of forty-four thousand and one (44,001) pounds or greater shall pay the county clerk thirty dollars ($30) for each registration. The clerk shall retain the thirty dollar ($30) fee for services performed under this subsection.

Any person requesting a certificate of registration or renewal of registration of any type of motor vehicle shall have the opportunity to donate one dollar ($1) to the child care assistance account. The one dollar ($1) donation shall be added to the regular fee for vehicle registration. One donation may be made per issuance or renewal of vehicle registration. Donation to the child care assistance account shall be voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of the issuance or renewal of any vehicle registration.

The county clerk may retain five percent (5%) of fees collected for the child care assistance account under subsection (4) of this section. The remaining funds shall be deposited into a trust and agency account in the State Treasury to the credit of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for the exclusive use as follows:

Funds shall be made available to the agencies that administer child care subsidy funds; and

Funds shall be used as determined by the cabinet for working families whose income exceeds the state income eligibility limits for child day care assistance.

Except as provided in KRS

186.162

, in addition to the registration fee provided for county clerks in subsections (1) and (3) of this section, an additional three dollars ($3) per registration shall be collected by the county clerk at the time of registration. This additional fee shall be distributed as follows:

One dollar ($1) shall be placed in an agency fund to provide additional funds exclusively for technological improvements or replacement of the AVIS system. The operation and maintenance of AVIS shall remain as currently provided for from the operational budget of the Transportation Cabinet and shall not be reduced below the 2005-2006 funding level;

One dollar ($1) shall be placed in an agency trust fund to provide funds exclusively for technological improvements to the hardware and software in county clerk offices related to the collection and administration of road fund taxes. The Transportation Cabinet, in consultation with county clerks, shall allocate funds as necessary from this fund to be used for this exclusive purpose; and

One dollar ($1) shall be placed in a trust fund to be maintained by the Transportation Cabinet to provide an unrestricted revenue supplement, for operations of the office related to the collection and administration of road fund taxes, to county clerk offices in counties containing a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000), as determined by the decennial census, and for no other purpose. Annually, by March 1, the Transportation Cabinet shall calculate the amount collected in the previous calendar year and distribute the entire fund proportionate to each county that qualifies under this paragraph based on population. This revenue shall be considered current year revenue when paid to the clerk and shall not be identified as excess fees from the previous year.

History.

2739g-10: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 4, 9; 1958, ch. 82, § 3; 1964, ch. 59, § 1; 1966, ch. 139, § 4; 1968, ch. 40, Part IV, § 1; 1982, ch. 375, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 37, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 118, § 102, effective July 1, 1987; 1994, ch. 428, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 544, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 124, § 41, effective July 1, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 144, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 255, § 7, effective January 1, 2007; 2021 ch. 92, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

186.041.
Special military-related license plates.

Each initial and renewal application by a person who meets the criteria of paragraph (a) of this section and each initial application by a person who meets the criteria of paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of this section for a special military license plate shall be accompanied by proof as set forth in subsection (10) of this section that the person is associated with the United States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States Coast Guard, United States Coast Guard Auxiliary, Kentucky National Guard, Merchant Marines with service between December 7, 1941, and August 15, 1945, or Civil Air Patrol in one (1) of the following ways:

A member of the Armed Forces of the United States;

A retired member;

A member of the National Guard or Reserve component who has completed his or her term of service, or has retired with a minimum of twenty (20) years of service; or

A veteran who received a discharge under honorable conditions, or the veteran’s surviving spouse, and:

Performed one hundred eighty (180) days of active-duty service;

Received an early release due to injuries or other medical condition, or at the convenience of the service;

Received a hardship discharge;

Was separated or retired due to a disability; or

Was determined to have a service-connected disability incurred during the enlistment.

The member, retired member, veteran, reservist, or his or her spouse who is eligible under subsection (9) of this section may purchase an unlimited number of special military-related license plates described in subsection (1) of this section, annually for vehicles they own or lease. A disabled veterans license plate shall expire on July 31.

A recipient of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross shall be eligible for a Service Cross license plate upon submission of an application to the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The recipient shall be required to include with the initial application for a Service Cross license plate a copy of the general order that authorized the award and the recipient’s Department of Defense form number 214. The Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall verify the documentation submitted with the application for a Service Cross license plate, and if the individual applying for the plate is confirmed to be a recipient of the Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, or Air Force Cross, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall submit the applicant’s name to the Transportation Cabinet’s Division of Motor Vehicle Licensing not later than September 1 preceding the year that the Service Cross license plate is to be initially issued or renewed. When the Service Cross license plate is ready, the plate shall be sent to the county clerk in the county of the applicant’s residence. The Transportation Cabinet’s Division of Motor Vehicle Licensing shall inform each applicant in writing that the Service Cross license plate is ready and may be picked up at the county clerk’s office. The Transportation Cabinet shall prescribe the type of application form required by this subsection and shall supply the Department of Veterans’ Affairs with the application form required by this subsection.

A person who is a former prisoner of the enemy during World War I, World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War, or the spouse of a deceased former prisoner of war, shall be eligible for a former prisoner of war license plate by submitting written proof from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other appropriate federal agency stating the period of time the person or person’s spouse was a prisoner of war. If a former prisoner of war dies with a vehicle licensed as authorized under this section, the person’s surviving spouse may retain the license plate for use on the same vehicle or on another vehicle that complies with KRS 186.164(7).

A person who is certified by the Kentucky chapter of the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association as being a survivor of the attack on Pearl Harbor shall be eligible for a Pearl Harbor license plate and shall be required to attach to the special military-related license plate application written evidence from the Kentucky chapter of the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association that the person:

Was a member of the United States Armed Forces on December 7, 1941;

Was on station on December 7, 1941, during the hours of 7:55 a.m. to 9:45 a.m., Hawaii time, at Pearl Harbor, the island of Oahu, or offshore at a distance not to exceed three (3) miles;

Was discharged honorably from the United States Armed Forces; and

Is certified by the Kentucky chapter of the Pearl Harbor Survivors Association.

A person who is eligible to receive a Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses license plate under KRS 186.164(15)(a) may receive up to two (2) Gold Star Mothers, Gold Star Fathers, or Gold Star Spouses license plates free of charge and may purchase additional license plates by paying the same fee as for special military-related plates issued under KRS 186.162(2)(d) annually for vehicles he or she owns or leases.

The surviving spouse of a Purple Heart recipient, or a Kentucky National Guard member or a retired member, who possessed a vehicle licensed with the Purple Heart recipient special license plate or the Kentucky National Guard special license plate, may retain the license plate for use on the same vehicle or another vehicle that complies with KRS 186.164(7). The surviving spouse may renew the license plate indefinitely, provided the appropriate registration fee is paid annually.

A person who is attending or who is a graduate of the United States Air Force Academy, the United States Military Academy, the United States Naval Academy, the United States Coast Guard Academy, or the United States Merchant Marine Academy shall be eligible for a special military service academy license plate. A special military service academy license plate under this subsection shall use the same plate template as the standard special military license plate under subsection (1) of this section, with stickers to identify the various service academies. The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish the proof required to demonstrate current attendance at or graduation from a service academy. An eligible applicant may receive up to two (2) special military service academy license plates.

The legally married spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who meets the criteria for a special military license plate under subsection (1) of this section shall be eligible for a special military license plate. A special military license plate under this subsection shall use the same template as the standard special military license plate under subsection (1) of this section, with a sticker identifying the plate as that of a military spouse.

An applicant who is eligible for a special military license plate under this subsection shall present as proof of eligibility an original or copy of his or her marriage certificate establishing marriage to the member of the Armed Forces of the United States and an original or copy of one (1) of the following:

His or her unexpired DD-1173 form; or

Any identification document outlined in subsection (10) of this section issued to his or her spouse.

Prior to receiving a special military-related plate requested under subsection (1) of this section, the applicant shall present as proof of eligibility, an original or copy of his or her:

Unexpired Veteran Identification Card or Veteran Health Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;

DD-2, DD-214, DD-256, DD-257, or NGB-22 form; or

Unexpired Geneva Conventions Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Defense.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 191, § 1; 2017 ch. 137, § 1, effective June 28, 2017; 2020 ch. 42, § 1, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 92, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Before the special free license plates are issued by the department of revenue (now revenue cabinet), the department (now cabinet) may require proof that the claimant did, in fact, receive financial assistance from the veterans administration under 38 USCS § 1901 and that he is now being paid disability compensation by the veterans administration pursuant to 38 USCS, §§ 301-360.

OAG 71-94

.

Evidence that the claimant is currently receiving disability compensation could take any reasonable form acceptable by the department of revenue (now revenue cabinet).

OAG 71-94

.

Those disabled veterans who have been furnished financial assistance from the veterans administration should obtain the special free license plates.

OAG 71-94

.

The issuance of a special automobile plate to a disabled veteran does not relieve him as the owner from payment of ad valorem property taxes on the vehicle.

OAG 74-775

.

Since the benefit bestowed in this section is tied in exclusively with 38 USCS § 1901, the free certificate and license plates authorized by this section are confined to the one vehicle provided by the veterans’ administration and there is no statutory authority for selling the special “Handicapped Veteran” license plates.

OAG 76-640

.

Although a National Guard member may only have a special license plate for one vehicle at a time, a guardsman must pay only a one time registration fee regardless of how long he keeps his vehicle or how often he changes vehicles and transfers the plate from one vehicle to the next.

OAG 76-693

.

The prohibition on cities under former subsection (4) of this section from imposing any automobile license fee was restricted to one vehicle owned by a qualifying veteran; accordingly, any additional motor vehicle owned by the disabled veteran would require the veteran to pay the regular motor vehicle license fee levied by the city.

OAG 81-194

.

Neither this section nor KRS

189.456

requires a city to provide specific handicapped parking facilities though there appears to be an implication to this effect under former KRS

189.456

(6) which authorizes handicapped persons qualifying to park in a designated handicapped parking place even when a parking limit is imposed, by allowing such vehicle to be parked for a period of two hours in excess of the legal parking period prescribed by the local authorities with certain exceptions mentioned therein. There is nothing under either statute prohibiting the charging of parking fees for handicapped parking spaces, the same as would be required for parking generally.

OAG 82-116

.

Special license plates authorized by this section for national guardsmen cannot be issued for a vehicle owned by a guardsman and his wife jointly and can only be issued for a vehicle of the kind required to be licensed under the provisions of KRS

186.050

(1).

OAG 77-108

.